Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-470
Highway, defined.

Highway shall mean the entire width between the boundary limits of any street, road, avenue, boulevard, or way which is publicly maintained when any part thereof is open to the use of the public for purposes of motor vehicle travel.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 20.